Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.045

Collective bargaining—Exclusive bargaining representative—Dues and other payments.

(1) Upon authorization of an employee within the bargaining unit and after the certification or recognition of the bargaining unit's exclusive bargaining representative, the employer must deduct from the payments to the employee the monthly amount of dues as certified by the secretary of the exclusive bargaining representative and must transmit the same to the treasurer of the exclusive bargaining representative.

(2) If the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit enter into a collective bargaining agreement that includes requirements for deductions of other payments, the employer must make such deductions upon authorization of the employee.

[ 2019 c 230 s 6; 2018 c 247 s 1; 1987 c 314 s 8.]